Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-244
License granted under reciprocal agreement; when.

The Board of Barber Examiners shall, upon presentation of a certification of licensure to practice barbering as a registered barber or instructor by the duly constituted authority of another state or country, with which this state has established reciprocal relations as authorized by section 71-239, and subject to the rules of the board, license such applicant to practice in this state unless an examination is required under section 71-242.

Laws 1983, LB 87, § 7.